test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-cievar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - čievâr: # 2A
    čievâr+N+Sg+Nom: čievâr
    čievâr+N+Sg+Gen: čiehâr
    čievâr+N+Sg+Acc: čiehâr
    čievâr+N+Sg+Ill: čiehârân
    čievâr+N+Sg+Loc: čiehârist
    čievâr+N+Sg+Com: čiehâráin
    čievâr+N+Sg+Abe: čiehârttáá
    čievâr+N+Ess:    čievârin
    čievâr+N+Par:    čievârid
    čievâr+N+Pl+Nom: čiehâreh
    čievâr+N+Pl+Gen: čiehârij
    čievâr+N+Pl+Acc: čiehârijd
    čievâr+N+Pl+Ill: čiehâráid
    čievâr+N+Pl+Loc: čiehârijn
    čievâr+N+Pl+Com: čiehârijguin
    čievâr+N+Pl+Abe: čiehârijttáá
   
